Utah statutes.
38-1a-105.   No waiver of rights -- Exception.

(1) (a)  A right or privilege under this chapter may not be waived or limited by contract.

(b)  A provision of a contract purporting to waive or limit a right or privilege under this chapter is void.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), a claimant may waive or limit, in whole or in part, a lien right under this chapter in consideration of payment as provided in Section 38-1a-802.

